Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 181A.205 is amended to read:
181A.205. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Authorized agency” means a state or local government agency authorized  by state
and federal law to submit  fingerprint-based background check requests for employment and
licensing purposes to the Federal Bureau  of Investigation and who may receive criminal
history record information in response to such requests.
(b) “Criminal history record information” means  information collected by and maintained
in the files of criminal justice agencies  concerning individuals, consisting of identifiable de-
scriptions, notations of arrest,  detentions, indictments or other formal criminal charges.
This includes any disposition, sentencing, correctional supervision, and release information.
(c) “Rap Back  program” means a system that enables authorized entities to receive on-
going status notifications of any criminal  history reported on individuals whose fingerprints
are registered in the system.
(d) “Rap Back system” means the Rap Back system maintained by the Federal  Bureau
of Investigation.
[(1)(a)] (2)(a) The Department of State Police shall establish a [ voluntary] fingerprint retention
program for participation in the Rap  Back system  through which the department  retains
fingerprint cards and facsimiles of  fingerprints provided to or received from the Federal
Bureau of Investigation that are obtained during a  state criminal records check requested
by an authorized agency for the purpose of employment or licensing. [:]
[(A) Retains fingerprint cards, facsimiles of fingerprints received  from the Federal Bureau of In-
vestigation or facsimiles of fingerprints created during a  state criminal records check under ORS
181A.190, 181A.195, 181A.200 or  267.237, for the purpose of providing information as described in
subsection (4) of this section; and ]
[(B) Provides facsimiles of fingerprints created during a state criminal records check  under ORS
181A.190, 181A.195, 181A.200 or 267.237 to the Federal Bureau of Investigation. ]
(b) The  department may not use fingerprint cards or facsimiles of fingerprints retained pursuant
to paragraph (a) of this subsection for any purpose other than the purpose of  providing information
as described in subsection [ (4)] (5) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 4122 (HB 4122-B) Page 1
[(2) An authorized agency as defined in ORS 181A.190 or 181A.195, an agency listed in ORS
181A.200 (2), or a  district as defined in ORS 267.237 may subscribe to the fingerprint retention pro-
gram.]
[(3)(a) If an authorized agency, agency or district subscribes to  the fingerprint retention program,
the authorized agency, agency or district must inform an individual subject to a  criminal records check
under ORS 181A.190, 181A.195, 181A.200 or 267.237 about the program in  a form and manner pre-
scribed by the authorized  agency, agency or district, provided that the authorized agency, agency or
district includes as part of that information notice of the following: ]
[(A) That the individual is not required to participate in the program; ]
[(B) That if the individual chooses to participate in the program, the  individual may, at any time,
stop participating in the program; ]
(3) An authorized agency may participate in the state  fingerprint retention program by
subscribing to the Rap Back program with  the Department of State Police and submitting
an implementation plan to an appropriate committee or interim committee of  the Legislative
Assembly related to the judiciary. In preparing  the implementation plan, an authorized
agency must consult with the department and with stakeholders, including  but not limited
to impacted providers and impacted employees. The implementation plan must describe:
(a) How the authorized agency will ensure  that fingerprinting is accessible for all indi-
viduals across geographic regions of the state and provider settings;
(b) How the authorized agency will ensure that fingerprinting accessibility  will not be a
barrier to enrollment in the Rap Back program for individuals;
(c) The estimated timeline for enrolling individuals in the Rap Back program;
(d) How the authorized agency  will educate and inform individuals about the Rap Back
program; and
(e) Projected costs associated with reducing barriers  to fingerprinting, including out-of-
pocket cost to the individual and  costs to the authorized agency for additional fingerprinting
services.
(4)(a) If an authorized agency subscribes to the Rap Back program,  the authorized
agency must inform an individual subject to a criminal records  check about the Rap Back
program in a form and manner prescribed  by the authorized agency. The authorized agency
must include the following information:
(A) That employment or licensing by the authorized agency requires  that the individual
be enrolled in the Rap Back program;
[(C)] (B) That [ choosing to participate in the program will allow ] the Rap Back program allows
the department to provide information as described in subsection [ (4)] (5) of this section;  and
[(D) The potential consequences of information being provided as described  in subsection (4) of this
section; and]
[(E)] (C) [ The process by which the individual may contest ] That ORS 181A.230 allows the in-
dividual to challenge the accuracy of information that is  provided as described  in subsection [ (4)]
(5) of this section.
(b) Notice provided pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection must be provided in  a clear and
easy to understand manner.
[(4)(a) An individual subject to a criminal records check under ORS 181A.190, 181A.195, 181A.200
or 267.237 may, but is not required to, participate in the fingerprint retention program. ]
[(b) If an individual participates in the program, then the department, upon receiving  forms con-
taining the person’s fingerprints and other identifying information under ORS 181A.160, or as part  of
any other proceeding related to the arrest of  the individual, shall provide that information to the au-
thorized agency,  agency or district for which a criminal records check under ORS 181A.190, 181A.195,
181A.200 or 267.237 for the individual was performed. ]
[(5) At any time, an individual participating in the fingerprint retention  program may inform the
department, in a form and manner prescribed  by the department, that the individual is no longer par-
Enrolled House Bill 4122 (HB 4122-B) Page 2
ticipating in the program. If an individual  informs the department that the individual is no longer
participating in the program, the department shall: ]
(5)(a) If  an individual is subject to a criminal records check for employment or licensing
and the authorized agency subscribes  to the Rap Back program, the individual shall be en-
rolled in the Rap Back program.
(b) Under the Rap Back program the Department of State Police may receive fingerprints
of individuals from an authorized agency and submit those fingerprints to the Rap Back
system to be retained in the Rap Back  system for the purposes of being searched by future
submissions to the Rap Back system, including latent fingerprint searches.
(c) The Rap Back system provides continuous evaluation of the criminal history status
of each individual enrolled in the Rap Back system as long as the individual remains in a
position of trust. If the Rap  Back system identifies a new criminal history event for an in-
dividual enrolled in the Rap Back program, the Federal Bureau of Investigation will send
notice to the department. Upon receiving notification from the Federal Bureau of Investi-
gation of a new criminal history  event, within or outside of Oregon, for an individual enrolled
in the Rap Back program, the department shall notify the authorized  agency that enrolled
the individual of the new criminal history event.
(6) An authorized agency that subscribes to  the Rap Back program shall notify the De-
partment of State Police, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, when an in-
dividual employed or licensed by the authorized agency and enrolled in the Rap Back program
is no longer employed or licensed by the authorized agency.
(7) When the department receives  notice that an individual is no longer employed or li-
censed by an authorized agency, the department shall:
(a) Destroy any printed and electronic fingerprint cards and facsimiles of fingerprints that the
department has retained for the individual as part of the Rap Back program;  and
(b) Notify the Federal Bureau of Investigation that the individual is no longer employed
or licensed by  the authorized agency and request that the Federal Bureau of Investigation
destroy any printed and  electronic fingerprint cards or facsimiles of fingerprints that the
Federal Bureau of Investigation has retained for the individual in the Rap Back system.
[(b) Inform  the Federal Bureau of Investigation that the individual is no longer participating in
the program and direct the Federal Bureau of Investigation to  destroy any fingerprint cards or fac-
similes of fingerprints that the Federal Bureau of Investigation has retained for the individual; and ]
[(c) Notify the authorized agency, agency or district who employs the individual that  the individual
is no longer participating in the program. ]
[(6) An authorized  agency, agency or district that subscribes to the fingerprint retention program
may not require a person to participate in the program as a condition of employment. ]
[(7)] (8) Information retained by the  department under this section is exempt from public dis-
closure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478, and the department may not disclose the information  for any
purpose not authorized by this section  or otherwise required by law .
[(8)] (9) The Department of State Police:
(a) Shall, in consultation  with the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, adopt rules
for the administration of this section; and
(b) May adopt a fee that an authorized agency, agency or district must  pay to subscribe to the
Rap Back program.
SECTION 2.
(1) The amendments to ORS 181A.205 by section  1 of this 2024 Act become
operative on January 1, 2025.
(2) To participate in the  Rap Back program described in ORS 181A.205, as amended by
section 1 of this 2024 Act, beginning on January  1, 2025, an authorized agency must subscribe
to the Rap Back program with  the Department of State Police and submit an implementation
plan meeting the requirements of ORS 181A.205 (3), as amended by section 1 of  this 2024 Act,
to a committee or interim committee  of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary
no later than December 31, 2024.
Enrolled House Bill 4122 (HB 4122-B) Page 3
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (4), chapter 386, Oregon Laws  2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  administrative services, agency support and criminal
justice information services, is increased by $540,734, for the purpose of carrying  out the
amendments to ORS 181A.205 by section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4122 (HB 4122-B) Page 4